Utah statutes.
77-30-5.   Extradition for prosecution before conclusion of trial or term in
other state -- Return of person involuntarily leaving demanding state.
When it is desired to have returned to this state a person charged in this
state with a crime, and such person is imprisoned or is held under criminal
proceedings then pending against him in another state, the governor of this
state may agree with the executive authority of such other state for the
extradition of such person before the conclusion of such proceedings or his
term of sentence in such other state, upon condition that such person be
returned to such other state at the expense of this state as soon as the
prosecution in this state is terminated.
The governor of this state may also surrender on demand of the executive
authority of any other state any person in this state who is charged in the
manner provided in Section 77-30-23 with having violated the laws of the state
whose executive authority is making the demand, even though such person left
the demanding state involuntarily.
